Louisiana, session 2026, SB496.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1962, 1964(8), 1972(C), the introductory paragraph of 1973(A)(1),
and 1973(A)(2) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 37:1968(C) and
1972(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1962. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words shall have the meaning ascribed
to them in this Section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Cable service provider" means any person or entity that provides
cable service over a cable system and directly, or through one or more affiliates,
owns a significant interest in that cable system, or that otherwise controls or is
responsible for, through any arrangement, the management and operation of
that system.
(2) "Carrier" means any person who transports in a transport vehicle
hazardous materials, freight, or passengers and includes a common, contract,
or private carrier.
(3) "Common carrier" includes all persons engaged in the transportation
of petroleum as public utilities and common carriers for hire, or which on
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 496 ENROLLED
proper showing may be legally held a common carrier from the nature of the
business conducted, or from the manner in which such business is carried on.
(4) "Copper or brass material" means either of the following:
(a) A power inverter, bus bar, insulated or noninsulated copper wire or
cable that contains copper or an alloy of copper and zinc, and that is of the type
used by any of the following:
(i) Cable service provider.
(ii) Carrier.
(iii) Person responsible for the construction, maintenance, service, or
operation of a pipeline.
(iv) Public utility.
(v) Telecommunications service provider.
(vi) Video service provider.
(b) Any copper or brass item of a type commonly used in construction
or by a person listed in this Paragraph.
(5) "Operator" means any person employed in responsible charge of
operating all or any portion of a scrap metal recycling facility.
(6) "Pipeline" means flow, transmission, distribution, or gathering lines,
regardless of size or length, which transmit or transport oil, gas,
petrochemicals, minerals, or water in a solid, liquid, or gaseous state.
(7) "Public utility" means any business or organization that regularly
supplies the public with a commodity or service, including electricity, gas,
water, telephone, telegraph, radio, drainage, sewerage, and other like services.
(2)(8) "Railroad track materials" means steel in the form of railroad tracks or
in the form of rail, switch components, spikes, angle bars, tie plates, or bolts of the
type used in constructing railroads, or any combination of such materials.
(3)(9) "Scrap metal" means metal materials which are purchased for resale
to be recycled, including but not limited to ferrous materials, catalytic converters,
auto hulks, copper, copper wire, copper alloy, bronze, zinc, aluminum other than in
the form of cans, stainless steel, nickel alloys, or brass, whether in the form of bars,
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 496 ENROLLED
cable, ingots, rods, tubing, wire, wire scraps, clamps or connectors, railroad track
materials, water utility materials, and used building components. The term shall not
include precious metals, including but not limited to gold, silver, and platinum.
(4)(10) "Scrap metal recycling facility" means any physical entity that has the
function of recycling scrap metal.
(11) "Telecommunications service" means the electronic transmission,
conveyance, or routing of voice, data, audio, video, or any other information or
signals to a point, or between or among points. "Telecommunications service"
includes the transmission, conveyance, or routing in which computer processing
applications are used to act on the form, code, or protocol of the content for
purposes of transmission, conveyance, or routing without regard to whether the
service is referred to as voice over internet protocol service or is classified by the
Federal Communications Commission as an enhanced or value-added service.
(5)(12) "Used building component" means any object produced or shaped by
human workmanship or tools that is an element of structural, architectural,
archaeological, historical, ornamental, cultural, utilitarian, decorative, or sentimental
significance or interest, which has been and may be used as an adjunct to or
component or ornament of any building or structure, regardless of monetary worth,
age, size, shape, or condition, that is immovable property, or fixtures or component
parts of immovable property of any nature or kind whatsoever.
(13) "Video service provider" means any entity providing video service
programming through wireline facilities located at least in part in any public
right-of-way without regard to delivery technology, including internet protocol
technology.
(6)(14) "Water utility materials" shall include but not be limited to water
meters, valves, pipes, and fittings.
* * *
§1964. Exemptions
The provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to:
* * *
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 496 ENROLLED
(8) The purchase of materials from any manufacturing, industrial, or other
commercial vendor that generates the materials as a byproduct or recyclable waste
or sells such materials in the ordinary course of its business. Business-to-business
purchase of materials by an operator from either of the following:
(a) Any licensed operator, scrap metal recycling facility, cable service
provider, carrier, public utility company, telecommunications service provider,
or video service provider.
(b) Any other manufacturing, industrial, or other commercial business,
or its agent, that generates scrap metal in the ordinary course and scope of its
business.
* * *
§1968. Photographic and other records; exceptions
* * *
C. In any transaction involving copper or brass material, every operator
shall be required to obtain a photograph of the person selling or delivering the
copper or brass material to the facility, a thumbprint of the person, the quality
of which thumbprint shall be sufficient to identify the person, and a photocopy
of the person's valid Louisiana driver's license, valid driver's license from
another state, valid passport, military identification, or identification issued by
a governmental agency or the United States Postal Service.
* * *
§1972. Daily report of entries
* * *
C. In any transaction involving copper or brass material, every operator
licensed pursuant to this Chapter shall, every day before the hour of twelve
noon, transmit pictures of all copper or brass materials purchased during the
previous day to an electronic database accessible by law enforcement.
D. The operator shall have the responsibility of tendering the information
provided for in Subsections A and B, B, and C of this Section regardless of its use
or nonuse by the chief of police in the city or town in which he is doing business or,
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 496 ENROLLED
alternatively, to the sheriff of the parish in which he is doing business. The tender of
this information is a courtesy mandated by state law and which provides a benefit to
the general public. The chief of police or sheriff shall not be mandated to take any
particular action concerning the information tendered.
§1973. Payment by loadable payment card or check for copper or brass materials,
aluminum-copper air conditioning coils, or other metals required;
check cashing prohibited
A.(1) An operator shall not enter into any cash transactions in payment for
the purchase of copper or brass materials, or aluminum-copper air conditioning
coils. After five business days from the date of the transaction, payment for copper
or brass materials, or aluminum-copper air conditioning coils shall be made in the
form of a check made payable to the name and address of the seller of the copper or
brass materials, or aluminum-copper air conditioning coils, or a loadable payment
card and shall be tendered to the seller in any of the following manners:
* * *
(2) An operator shall not enter into any cash transactions in excess of three
hundred dollars in payment for the purchase of metal property other than copper or
brass materials, or aluminum-copper air conditioning coils. Payments in excess of
three hundred dollars for metals other than copper or brass materials, or aluminum-
copper air conditioning coils shall be made in the form of a check made payable to
the name and address of the seller or a loadable payment card and may be tendered
to the seller at the time of the transaction. The operator, at his discretion, may make
payment by either cash or other method for transactions of three hundred dollars or
less for all metals other than copper or brass materials, or aluminum-copper air
conditioning coils.
* * *
C. Pursuant to the provisions of this Section, if an operator makes a payment
to the seller in the form of a check or loadable payment card, the operator shall
require verification of the seller's identification by a valid driver's license or similar
means and shall require verification of the seller's address by a current utility bill.
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 496 ENROLLED
The operator shall retain a copy of such utility bill.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.